Washington statutes.
RCW 18.85.471

Real estate research center—Purpose. (Expires September 30, 2025.)

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1552.SL) ***

(1) The purpose of a real estate research center in Washington state is to provide credible research, value-added information, education services, and project-oriented research to real estate licensees, real estate consumers, real estate service providers, institutional customers, public agencies, and communities in Washington state and the Pacific Northwest region. The center may:

(a) Conduct studies and research on affordable housing and strategies to meet the affordable housing needs of the state;

(b) Conduct studies in all areas directly or indirectly related to real estate and urban or rural economics and economically isolated communities;

(c) Disseminate findings and results of real estate research conducted at or by the center or elsewhere, using a variety of dissemination media;

(d) Supply research results and educational expertise to the Washington state real estate commission to support its regulatory functions, as requested;

(e) Prepare information of interest to real estate consumers and make the information available to the general public, universities, or colleges, and appropriate state agencies;

(f) Encourage economic growth and development within the state of Washington;

(g) Support the professional development and continuing education of real estate licensees in Washington;

(h) Study and recommend changes in state statutes relating to real estate; and

(i) Develop a vacancy rate standard for low-income housing in the state.

(2) The director shall establish a memorandum of understanding with an institution of higher learning that establishes a real estate research center for the purposes under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) This section expires September 30, 2025.

[ 2015 c 175 s 3; 2010 c 156 s 3; 2005 c 185 s 3; 2002 c 294 s 5; 1999 c 192 s 3. Formerly RCW 18.85.540.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2010 c 156: See note following RCW 18.85.451.

Findings—2002 c 294: See note following RCW 36.18.010.